Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 6. PUBLIC OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

SUBTITLE B. STATE OFFICERS AND EMPLOYEES

CHAPTER 655. MERIT SELECTION

Sec. 655.001. APPLICABILITY. This chapter applies only to a state agency that is required by federal law or regulation to use a merit system of personnel administration for the agency or for a program administered under the agency.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 655.002. MERIT SELECTION PRINCIPLES. (a) A state agency by rule shall establish intraagency policies and procedures to ensure:

(1) compliance with the federal requirements; and

(2) the recruitment, selection, and advancement of highly competent agency personnel.

(b) A rule adopted under this section must ensure that the state agency:

(1) recruits, selects, and promotes its employees according to the relative abilities, knowledge, and skills of the applicants or employees;

(2) provides equitable and adequate compensation to an employee;

(3) provides any employee training necessary to ensure performance of a high quality;

(4) uses the adequacy of an employee's job performance to determine whether the employee will be retained;

(5) treats a job applicant or employee fairly in all aspects of personnel administration;

(6) complies fully with state and federal equal opportunity and nondiscrimination laws; and

(7) protects an employee against coercion for partisan political purposes and prohibits the employee from using employment status to interfere with or affect the result of an election or nomination for office.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 655.003. ADDITIONAL MERIT SELECTION PRINCIPLES. A state agency shall implement any additional merit principles required by federal law or regulation.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 655.004. ADMINISTRATION OF MERIT SELECTION. A state agency may create a separate division within the agency to administer merit selection policies and procedures if the chief executive of the agency considers the creation necessary.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.